North Carolina, session 2025, SB424.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 11.11(d) of S.L. 2022-74 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 11.11.(d) Allocation. – EDPNC shall allocate monies in the Fund on the
following basis:
(1) The first one million dollars ($1,000,000) appropriated to the Fund for
engaging a national site selection firm through a competitive bid process to
produce a report evaluating sites in the State and determining the five
megasites best positioned for advanced manufacturing site selection searches
conducted by major employers.
(2) All other funds appropriated to the Fund for local government grants for the
acquisition of megasites determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection. purposes described in subsection (a) of this section. A grant for
the acquisition of a megasite is limited to eighty-five percent (85%) of the
lesser of the property's purchase price or tax value. The percentage actually
provided in the grant shall be determined by EDPNC based on total
development needs for the megasite, prior investment in the megasite by one
or more local governments, the ability of one or more local governments to
invest in the megasite, and the ability and level of participation promised by
the local government in exchange for a grant from the Fund. Monies may only
be granted for, and used to acquire, a megasite for which (i) one or more local
governments have a binding option or offer to purchase and (ii) all basic due
diligence must be complete, including, but not limited to, boundary surveys,
title searches, State Historic Preservation Office reviews, and wetlands
delineation."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S424-v-1*